Utah statutes.
72-2-111.   Assent to federal acts on federal aid for highway purposes -- Department to represent state -- Pledge of funds -- Rulemaking authority -- Contracts for energy conservation.

(1) (a)  The Legislature assents to all the provisions of Title 23, Highways, U.S.C., relating to federal aid for highway purposes, and all amendatory acts.

(b)  The department may:

(i)  enter into a contract or agreement with the United States government relating to the survey, construction, and maintenance of highways under a federal act;

(ii)  submit a scheme or program of construction and maintenance required by a federal agency; and

(iii)  do any other thing necessary to fully carry out the cooperation contemplated and provided for by a federal act.

(c) The good faith of the state is pledged to make available sufficient funds to match the sums apportioned to the state by the United States government:

(i)  for the construction of federal-aid highways; and

(ii)  to provide adequate maintenance for federal-aid highways.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules to encourage car pools and van pools in order to save energy.

(3)  The department may contract with individuals, associations, or corporations to accomplish energy conservation and encouragement of car and van pooling.

